Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2673.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 233 the
following new chapter:–
Chapter 233A. Massachusetts Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act
Section 1. Purpose. This chapter governs depositions and discovery conducted in this
commonwealth in connection with a civil action brought in another state.
Section 2. Definitions. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
a)“Foreign jurisdiction,” a state other than the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
of 4

b)“Foreign subpoena,” a subpoena issued under authority of a court of record in a foreign
jurisdiction.
c)“Person,” an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited
liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental
subdivision, agncy or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
d) “State,” a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
e)“Subpoena,” a document, however denominated, issued under authority of a court of
record requiring a person to:
i.attend and give testimony at a deposition;
ii.produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books, documents, records,
electronically stored information, or tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of the
person; or
iiipermit inspection of premises under the control of the person.
Section 3. Issuance of Subpoena for Interstate Depositions and Discovery.
a)To request issuance of a subpoena under this chapter, a party or an attorney shall
submit a foreign subpoena or court order from the foreign jurisdiction to a clerk of court in the
county in this commonwealth in which discovery is sought to be conducted, along with (i) a
Commonwealth of Massachusetts subpoena for signature by the clerk; (ii) a list of all counsel, or
unrepresented parties, in the foreign action and their addresses and phone numbers, and (iii) the
of 4

required filing fee to be designated and published by the Court in which the foreign subpoena or
court order from the foreign jurisdiction is submitted. A request for the issuance of a subpoena
under this act does not constitute an appearance in the courts of this commonwealth. An
unrepresented party may request issuance of a subpoena pursuant to this chapter, but may sign
the foreign subpoena only if such signing is authorized by the rules of the foreign jurisdiction.
b)When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in this commonwealth, the
clerk, in accordance with that court’s procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service
upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed.
c)A subpoena under subsection (b) shall:
i. incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena;
ii .contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all
counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party not
represented by counsel; and
iii. advise the person to whom the subpoena is directed that such a person has a right to
move in the Massachusetts court, in compliance with the applicable rules of discovery, for an
order to quash or modify the subpoena.
d)Notwithstanding subsection (a), if a party to an out-of-state proceeding retains an
attorney licensed to practice in this commonwealth, and that attorney receives the original or a
true copy of an out-of-state subpoena, the attorney may issue a subpoena under this section.
Section 4. Service of Subpoena
of 4

A subpoena issued by a clerk of court under Section 3(a), or by an attorney licensed to
practice in this commonwealth under Section 3(d), shall be served in compliance with Rule 45(c)
of the Massachusetts Rules of Civil Procedure.
Section 5. Deposition, Production, and Inspection.
Subparts (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), and (g) of Rule 45 of the Massachusetts Rules of Civil
Procedure shall apply to subpoenas issued under Section 3.
Section 6. Application to Court.
An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a
subpoena issued under Section 3 shall comply with Rules 26(c) and 45(d)(1) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Civil Procedure and be submitted to the applicable court in the county in
which discovery is to be conducted.
Section 7. Reciprocity.
If the foreign jurisdiction has not enacted provisions substantially similar to this chapter,
the foreign subpoena shall comply with the requirements of Section 11 of Chapter 223A of the
General Laws.
Section 2. Effective Date. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2024, and shall apply to
requests for discovery in cases pending as of that date.
of 4